lexc/noun/enhumelyjaje.lexc
LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! uses plur, fam, case of AddNoun
LEXICON AddNounannyi
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possannyi;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possannyi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^unk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^ótok   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^ójuk   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JJ§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JJ§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JJ§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JJ§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JJ§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JJ§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounak
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurak;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Plurak
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^ak    Gen;
                            Gen;
LEXICON AddNounek
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurek;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Plurek
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^ek    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON Noun
Abday AddNounak;
Abu-Dzabi AddNounak;
Acsády AddNounak;
Aggházy AddNounak;
Ajtay AddNounak;
Alapy AddNounak;
Ali AddNounak;
Almásy AddNounak;
Alsópásztori AddNounak;
Andi AddNounak;
Andrasovszky AddNounak;
Andrásofszky AddNounak;
Angi AddNounak;
Annamari AddNounak;
Anti AddNounak;
Apáthy AddNounak;
Aranyosapáti AddNounak;
Aranyváry AddNounak;
Aszódy AddNounak;
Azary AddNounak;
Babocsay AddNounak;
Bacsányi AddNounak;
Bagossy AddNounak;
Bajnáczky AddNounak;
Bajtay AddNounak;
Bakody AddNounak;
Bakonytamási AddNounak;
Baktay AddNounak;
Balassi AddNounak;
Balatonalmádi AddNounak;
Balatonudvari AddNounak;
Baldácsy AddNounak;
Balkay AddNounak;
Balsay AddNounak;
Balássy AddNounak;
Bandi AddNounak;
Barankay AddNounak;
Baranyay AddNounak;
Barbi AddNounak;
Barnay AddNounak;
Barsy AddNounak;
Bartóky AddNounak;
Baránszky AddNounak;
Baskay AddNounak;
Batizfalvy AddNounak;
Batthyányi AddNounak;
Bay AddNounak;
Bazsi AddNounak;
Beleznay AddNounak;
Beliczay AddNounak;
Belohorszky AddNounak;
Benoschofsky AddNounak;
Beresztóczy AddNounak;
Bernoulli AddNounak;
Bernárdfy AddNounak;
Berwaldszky AddNounak;
Bisztray AddNounak;
Bláthy AddNounak;
Bodrogolaszi AddNounak;
Bogi AddNounak;
Bolkay AddNounak;
Bolyai AddNounak;
Bonfini AddNounek;
Boray AddNounak;
Bori AddNounak;
Borovszky AddNounak;
Bory AddNounak;
Botvay AddNounak;
Bozzay AddNounak;
Brestyánszky AddNounak;
Brezanóczy AddNounak;
Brocky AddNounak;
Brumi AddNounak;
Brázay AddNounak;
Bucsay AddNounak;
Buczy AddNounak;
Bugatti AddNounak;
Bábolnay AddNounak;
Bándy AddNounak;
Bánhorváti AddNounak;
Bányay AddNounak;
Bárczy AddNounak;
Básthy AddNounak;
Báthori AddNounak;
Báthy AddNounak;
Bátory AddNounak;
Bóday AddNounak;
Bókay AddNounak;
Cathry AddNounak;
Ce-tung-i AddNounak;
Chomsky AddNounak;
Csabaszabadi AddNounak;
Csabi AddNounak;
Csajághy AddNounak;
Csapi AddNounak;
Csatáry AddNounak;
Csinády AddNounak;
Csomay AddNounak;
Csonkapapi AddNounak;
Csornoky AddNounak;
Csudáky AddNounak;
Csáky AddNounak;
Csárszky AddNounak;
Csáthy AddNounak;
Csávossy AddNounak;
Czupy AddNounak;
Dajaszászy AddNounak;
Dani AddNounak;
Dapsy AddNounak;
Darmay AddNounak;
Daruváry AddNounak;
Diskay AddNounak;
Diósy AddNounak;
Dobray AddNounak;
Dobrossy AddNounak;
Dobránszky AddNounak;
Dolinay AddNounak;
Dombay AddNounak;
Domby AddNounak;
Donászy AddNounak;
Draskóczy AddNounak;
Drágffy AddNounak;
Drávatamási AddNounak;
Dubravszky AddNounak;
Dulházy AddNounak;
Dunaharaszti AddNounak;
Duray AddNounak;
Dálnoky AddNounak;
Dévay AddNounak;
Dóri AddNounak;
Egyházasharaszti AddNounak;
Erdőhorváti AddNounak;
Esztergályhorváti AddNounak;
Faludy AddNounak;
Farbaky AddNounak;
Fejérváry AddNounak;
Ferdinandy AddNounak;
Filarszky AddNounak;
Folkusházy AddNounak;
Frecskay AddNounak;
Fruzsi AddNounak;
Fu-ce-i AddNounek;
Fáncsi AddNounak;
Fáni AddNounak;
Fóthy AddNounak;
Gagyhy AddNounak;
Galánthay AddNounak;
Garvay AddNounak;
Gerlóczy AddNounak;
Gortvay AddNounak;
Gulácsy AddNounak;
Gyalókay AddNounak;
Gyulaffy AddNounak;
Gyöngyösoroszi AddNounak;
Gánóczy AddNounak;
Gáthy AddNounak;
Hadváry AddNounak;
Hajnóczy AddNounak;
Halmay AddNounak;
Halászi AddNounak;
Hankóczy AddNounak;
Hargitay AddNounak;
Hatolkay AddNounak;
Hegyközpályi AddNounak;
Hidasy AddNounak;
Hollay AddNounak;
Holmes-i AddNounek;
Homoródy AddNounak;
Horkay AddNounak;
Horvay AddNounak;
Hosszúpályi AddNounak;
Hubay AddNounak;
Hunyady AddNounak;
Huxley AddNounek;
Házy AddNounak;
Ikvay AddNounak;
István-i AddNounak;
Jajczay AddNounak;
Jancsi AddNounak;
Janitsáry AddNounak;
Joli AddNounak;
Julcsi AddNounak;
Jánoky AddNounak;
Járay AddNounak;
Jászay AddNounak;
Kabay AddNounak;
Kamondy AddNounak;
Kapossy AddNounak;
Karcsi AddNounak;
Karinthy AddNounek;
Kassay AddNounak;
Kazay AddNounak;
Kazinczy AddNounek;
Kertay AddNounak;
Kisfaludy AddNounak;
Kistamási AddNounak;
Kobulszky AddNounak;
Kolacskovszky AddNounak;
Komensky AddNounek;
Komjáthy AddNounak;
Komoróczy AddNounak;
Komócsy AddNounak;
Koritsánszky AddNounak;
Korompay AddNounak;
Kosztolányi AddNounak;
Kováry AddNounak;
Kray AddNounak;
Krúdy AddNounak;
Kunovszky AddNounak;
Kurunczy AddNounak;
Kvassay AddNounak;
Kálnoky AddNounak;
Kánásy AddNounak;
Károsy AddNounak;
Kóródy AddNounak;
Lachky AddNounak;
Lajthay AddNounak;
Lanka-i AddNounak;
Lehotay AddNounak;
Leszkay AddNounak;
Lipthay AddNounak;
Lontay AddNounak;
Lossonczy AddNounak;
Lovászy AddNounak;
Lugosy AddNounak;
Láczay AddNounak;
Lánghy AddNounak;
Légrády AddNounak;
Lósy AddNounak;
Madarassy AddNounak;
Magyary AddNounak;
Makláry AddNounak;
Manci AddNounak;
Marci AddNounak;
Margittay AddNounak;
Marinó-i AddNounak;
Martonyi AddNounak;
Maszlaghy AddNounak;
Mattyasovszky AddNounak;
Medgyaszay AddNounak;
Mericzay AddNounak;
Migray AddNounak;
Miklóssy AddNounak;
Mirkovszky AddNounak;
Mochonaky AddNounak;
Mohácsy AddNounak;
Molnári AddNounak;
Moresby AddNounek;
Moresby-i AddNounek;
Morvay AddNounak;
Muhi AddNounak;
Muttnyánszky AddNounak;
Mády AddNounak;
Mályi AddNounak;
Márffy AddNounak;
Márokpapi AddNounak;
Mártély AddNounek;
Méray AddNounak;
Nagybákay AddNounak;
Nagyolaszi AddNounak;
Nagysimonyi AddNounak;
Naláczy AddNounak;
Neogrády AddNounak;
Noszkay AddNounak;
Novobátzky AddNounak;
Nyizsnyay AddNounak;
Nyírcsászári AddNounak;
Nádaskay AddNounak;
Nándi AddNounak;
Nógrády AddNounak;
Ocsvay AddNounak;
Olgyay AddNounak;
Orczy AddNounak;
Ormay AddNounak;
Oroszi AddNounak;
Oslay AddNounak;
Ováry AddNounak;
Pallay AddNounak;
Palugyay AddNounak;
Pannonius-i AddNounak;
Paskai AddNounak;
Patay AddNounak;
Pauló-i AddNounak;
Petróczy AddNounak;
Podhonzky AddNounak;
Polgárdi AddNounak;
Porffy AddNounak;
Posztóczky AddNounak;
Privorszky AddNounak;
Puky AddNounak;
Pusztaapáti AddNounak;
Pákozdy AddNounak;
Pándy AddNounak;
Pártay AddNounak;
Pátzay AddNounak;
Püspökmolnári AddNounak;
Radocsay AddNounak;
Raffay AddNounak;
Rakodczay AddNounak;
Ray AddNounak;
Ricó-i AddNounak;
Rippl-Rónai AddNounak;
Ronkay AddNounak;
Rozi AddNounak;
Rudnyánszky AddNounak;
Russay AddNounak;
Rábakovácsi AddNounak;
Ráday AddNounak;
Rákóczi AddNounak;
Ráttky AddNounak;
Révai AddNounak;
Rózsay AddNounak;
Sanyi AddNounak;
Saárossy AddNounak;
Siklóssy AddNounak;
Simonkay AddNounak;
Solymosy AddNounak;
Somogyapáti AddNounak;
Somóczy AddNounak;
Suzuki AddNounak;
Szabady AddNounak;
Szacsvay AddNounak;
Szakátsy AddNounak;
Szalkay AddNounak;
Szalóky AddNounak;
Szandi AddNounak;
Szarvasy AddNounak;
Szecsody AddNounak;
Szentkláray AddNounak;
Szentmiklósy AddNounak;
Szervánszky AddNounak;
Szilassy AddNounak;
Szilvásy AddNounak;
Szlávy AddNounak;
Szokolszky AddNounak;
Szombathy AddNounak;
Sztankóczy AddNounak;
Szuhay AddNounak;
Szvetenay AddNounak;
Szászky AddNounak;
Szénássy AddNounak;
Sághy AddNounak;
Sárdy AddNounak;
Sárosy AddNounak;
Sáry AddNounak;
Sövényházy AddNounak;
Taky AddNounak;
Tamássy AddNounak;
Tarczy AddNounak;
Tary AddNounak;
Tatrosy AddNounak;
Teplánszky AddNounak;
Tersztyánszky AddNounak;
Thorotzkay AddNounak;
Tinódi AddNounak;
Toborffy AddNounak;
Tolnay AddNounak;
Torday AddNounak;
Turnowsky AddNounak;
Táray AddNounak;
Tóthfalussy AddNounak;
Túróczy AddNounak;
Udvary AddNounak;
Ujházy AddNounak;
Unghváry AddNounak;
Urmánczy AddNounak;
Uzi AddNounak;
Vali AddNounak;
Vasváry AddNounak;
Vegas-i AddNounak;
Vesztróczy AddNounak;
Visóoroszi AddNounak;
Vámosoroszi AddNounak;
Ványai AddNounak;
Várossy AddNounak;
Wallaszky AddNounak;
York-i AddNounak;
Zalánfy AddNounak;
Zerinváry AddNounak;
Zipernowsky AddNounak;
Zombory AddNounak;
Zsigmondy AddNounak;
Zsirkay AddNounak;
Zsolti AddNounak;
Zulawszky AddNounak;
amannyi AddNounannyi;
cintányér AddNounannyi;
csakannyi AddNounannyi;
csemegéstányér AddNounannyi;
falitányér AddNounannyi;
fatányér AddNounannyi;
feleannyi AddNounannyi;
félannyi AddNounannyi;
kehelytányér AddNounannyi;
kistányér AddNounannyi;
lapostányér AddNounannyi;
levesestányér AddNounannyi;
megannyi AddNounannyi;
mindannyi AddNounannyi;
mindmegannyi AddNounannyi;
mélytányér AddNounannyi;
nagytányér AddNounannyi;
szintannyi AddNounannyi;
tányér AddNounannyi;
ugyanannyi AddNounannyi;
Érszakácsi AddNounak;
éppannyi AddNounannyi;
